Illinois, session 104th, SB3006.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Domestic Violence Fatality Review Act is 5amended by changing Sections 35, 40, and 65 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 62/35)7    Sec. 35. Statewide Committee quorum; meetings; 8compensation. 9    (a) A quorum shall consist of a simple majority 7 of the 10voting members of the Statewide Committee. 11    (b) The first meeting of the Statewide Committee shall 12occur by January 15, 2022. At the first meeting and at 13subsequent meetings when terms expire, the voting members 14shall elect 2 co-chairs and a secretary from among the voting 15members and may elect any other officers and other officers 16the voting members deem necessary to carry out the duties and 17responsibilities of the Statewide Committee. 18    (c) The Statewide Committee shall meet at least quarterly 19each State fiscal year. Additional meetings may be called by 20the co-chairs, after at least 7 days prior notice to the 21Statewide Committee members, or upon a written request signed 22by at least 5 Statewide Committee members to the co-chairs for 23a meeting request. Meetings may be held by a virtual meeting   SB3006 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1format during a public health emergency or disaster 2proclamation declared by the Governor, or at the discretion of 3the co-chairs.4    (d) The meetings of the Statewide Committee are subject to 5the Open Meetings Act, except the following shall occur in 6closed executive sessions not subject to the requirements of 7the Open Meetings Act:8        (1) discussions about personnel matters, confidential 9    information as defined by Section 5, or cases eligible for 10    review under Section 70; and11        (2) conducting a domestic violence fatality review.12    (e) The members shall receive no compensation for their 13service as members of the Statewide Committee, but may receive 14reimbursement for actual expenses incurred in the performance 15of their duties, subject to the availability of funds for that 16purpose.17(Source: P.A. 102-520, eff. 8-20-21.) 18    (750 ILCS 62/40)19    Sec. 40. Duties and responsibilities of the Statewide 20Committee. 21    (a) The Statewide Committee shall carry out the following 22duties and responsibilities:23        (1) Subject to available funds, hire or assign a 24    full-time Program Manager to carry out the duties and 25    responsibilities of the Statewide Committee and the   SB3006 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1    purposes of this Act. The Program Manager may hire 2    additional staff, subject to the availability of funds for 3    that purpose and subject to the approval of the Board. The 4    Statewide Committee and regional review teams can operate 5    without an acting Program Manager.6        (2) Establish and maintain an Internet website.7        (3) Prepare an annual budget that includes 8    compensation for the Program Manager and staff, and 9    financial reimbursement to regional review team members or 10    teams for actual expenses incurred in the performance of 11    their duties, subject to the availability of funds for 12    that purpose.13        (4) Facilitate the establishment and implementation of 14    regional review teams across the State over 6 years after 15    the effective date of this Act and collaboratively develop 16    regional implementation plans and procedures.17        (5) Provide training and ongoing technical assistance 18    to regional review teams. 19        (6) Conduct, or assist in conducting, regional 20    domestic violence fatality reviews if requested by 21    regional review teams in specific cases.22        (7) Develop model confidentiality agreement, policies, 23    and procedures for the use of regional review teams.24        (8) Develop guidelines for the annual and biennial 25    reports of the Statewide Committee and the regional review 26    teams pursuant to this Section and Section 65.  SB3006 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1        (9) Appoint the initial members of each regional 2    review team in accordance with Section 50 or designate a 3    founding member of a regional review team to form the 4    remainder of the regional review team in accordance with 5    Section 50, unless the regional review team has been 6    formed prior to the effective date of this Act or elects to 7    form without the involvement of the Statewide Committee.8        (10) Create a process whereby the Statewide Committee 9    shall annually officially recognize regional review teams 10    that are formed and operated in substantial compliance 11    with the requirements of this Act, and nonrecognize those 12    regional review teams that are substantially out of 13    compliance after reasonable efforts are made by the 14    Statewide Committee to engage the regional review team's 15    co-chairs and other regional stakeholders to facilitate 16    corrective actions to bring the regional review team into 17    substantial compliance. A nonrecognized regional review 18    team no longer has the authority to operate under this 19    Act, however, nonrecognition would not preclude the 20    formation of a new regional review team for the affected 21    region.22        (11) Review, analyze, maintain, and securely store 23    regional review team reports and recommendations submitted 24    by each regional review team as required by Section 65.25        (12) File an annual report with the Governor and the 26    General Assembly on the operations and activities of the   SB3006 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1    Statewide Committee and of the regional review teams. The 2    first report shall be due no later than March 1, 2023, and 3    each subsequent report shall be due no later than 4    September March 1 of each year thereafter. The annual 5    report shall be made publicly available on the Statewide 6    Committee's Internet website.7        (13) In even numbered years, file a substantive 8    biennial report reviewing and analyzing the data and 9    recommendations collected from the reports of the regional 10    review teams. The biennial report shall include specific 11    recommendations for legislative, systemic, policy, and any 12    other changes to reduce domestic violence and domestic 13    violence related fatalities and near-fatalities. The first 14    report shall be due no later than April 1, 2024, and each 15    subsequent report shall be due no later than April 1 of 16    each even year thereafter. The biennial report shall be 17    made publicly available on the Statewide Committee's 18    Internet website.19    (b) The Statewide Committee may carry out the following 20duties and responsibilities:21        (1) After a vote by the majority of the voting 22    Statewide Committee members or a decision by the 23    co-chairs, establish one or more subcommittees or task 24    forces to address specific issues regarding domestic 25    violence, domestic violence fatalities and 26    near-fatalities, domestic violence fatality review, or   SB3006 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1    other related issues or subject matters, and may invite 2    nonmembers with expertise on the issue or subject matter 3    to serve on the subcommittee or task force. Each 4    subcommittee or task force shall be chaired by a member of 5    the Statewide Committee.6        (2) Advise the Governor and General Assembly on 7    domestic violence, domestic violence fatalities and 8    near-fatalities, domestic violence fatality review, data, 9    and related topics or policies.10        (3) Engage nonmember stakeholders in reviewing 11    selected recommendations from the regional review teams in 12    accordance with notions of fairness, equity, justice, due 13    process, and practicality.14        (4) Analyze data and identify trends related to 15    domestic violence and domestic violence related fatalities 16    and near-fatalities, and develop mechanisms for 17    collecting, analyzing, and storing data that it collects 18    or that is provided by the regional review teams.19        (5) Adopt administrative rules in order to implement 20    this Act.21        (6) Subject to the availability of funding and 22    approval by a vote of the majority of the Statewide 23    Committee members, engage with and enter into contracts 24    with a higher education institution or research entity for 25    research, analysis, training, and educational purposes in 26    furtherance of the purposes of this Act. Statewide   SB3006 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1    Committee members or Statewide Committee staff shall not 2    share information with contractors that would disclose the 3    identities of victims, survivors, deceased, offenders, and 4    their family members or by which their identities can be 5    determined by a reasonably diligent inquiry.6        (7) Support the implementation of systemic and 7    community reform recommendations in order to advance the 8    purposes of this Act.9        (8) Adopt notice of funding opportunities, award 10    grants, or enter into contracts with statewide or local 11    organizations that advocate on behalf of survivors.12        (9) Assign any responsibilities under this Section.13        (10) Engage in any other activities that enable the 14    Statewide Committee, its staff, and the regional review 15    teams to carry out the purposes of this Act.16(Source: P.A. 102-520, eff. 8-20-21.) 17    (750 ILCS 62/65)18    Sec. 65. Duties and responsibilities of the regional 19domestic violence fatality review team. 20    (a) Each regional review team shall carry out the 21following duties and responsibilities:22        (1) Form a regional review team in accordance with 23    Sections 50 and 55.24        (2) Report the names, professional titles, if 25    applicable, and business contact information of each   SB3006 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1    review team member to the Statewide Committee and inform 2    the Statewide Committee in a timely manner of any changes 3    to the membership of the regional review team.4        (3) Create a secure system of maintaining and storing 5    minutes, correspondence, and confidential information 6    related to the regional review team and the domestic 7    violence fatality reviews.8        (4) Ensure that each member of the regional review 9    team participates in trainings and technical assistance 10    provided by the Statewide Committee and other 11    professionals.12        (5) Meet at least quarterly and maintain minutes of 13    the business conducted by the regional review team at each 14    meeting.15        (6) Establish priorities for reviewing eligible cases 16    that consider, in part, demographic and case type 17    diversity.18        (7) Based upon information available from a variety of 19    sources, consider cases eligible for review in accordance 20    with Section 70. 21        (8) Vote by a majority of the regional review team 22    members to review a specific case based upon various 23    factors, including the priorities by the regional review 24    team.25        (9) Invite and coordinate with the specific people 26    designated in Section 50 who were involved in the selected   SB3006 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1    domestic violence related fatality or near-fatality to 2    participate in the domestic violence fatality review. 3    Members of the regional review team may also participate 4    directly in the domestic violence fatality review.5        (10) Execute a confidentiality agreement with each 6    member of the regional review team and participant of a 7    domestic violence fatality review in accordance with 8    Section 75. 9        (11) Conduct a domestic violence fatality review of at 10    least 2 eligible cases per calendar year, or, if the 11    regional review team is unable to complete at least 2 12    reviews in a given year, provide an explanation to the 13    Statewide Committee in the regional review team's annual 14    report pursuant to paragraph (12).15        (12) Prepare and submit an annual report to the 16    Statewide Committee on the operations and activities of 17    the regional review team in accordance with guidelines 18    established by the Statewide Committee. The initial report 19    shall be due on March 1 following the formation of the 20    regional review team and subsequent reports shall be 21    submitted no later than March 1 of each year thereafter.22        (13) On odd numbered years, prepare and submit to the 23    Statewide Committee a biennial report based upon the 24    domestic violence fatality reviews of the corresponding 25    time period. The biennial report shall include specific 26    recommendations for legislative, systemic, policy, and any   SB3006 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1    other changes to reduce domestic violence and domestic 2    violence related fatalities and near-fatalities. These 3    recommendations will be reviewed by the Statewide 4    Committee according to Section 40 and will, in part, 5    inform the Statewide Committee's biennial report on even 6    years. Any information that identifies the victims, 7    survivors, deceased, or offenders, or their family members 8    or any information by which their identities can be 9    determined by a reasonably diligent inquiry shall not be 10    disclosed in any domestic violence fatality review 11    biennial report or by any other means. Any narrative of 12    nonidentifying facts will be limited to those essential 13    and indispensable to the explanation of data analysis or a 14    recommendation for reform. Aggregate and nonidentifying 15    data, including demographics, may be included in the 16    biennial report. The first biennial report shall be due no 17    later than April 1, 2023, and each subsequent report shall 18    be due no later than June April 1 of each odd year 19    thereafter.20    (b) Each regional review team may carry out the following 21duties and responsibilities:22        (1) Collect and analyze data from its regional area 23    regarding cases eligible for review that were and were not 24    reviewed by the regional review team for purposes of 25    identifying patterns and making recommendations for 26    community and systemic reforms.  SB3006 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17917 JRC 31353 b1        (2) Subject to the availability of funding and 2    approval by a vote of the majority of the regional review 3    team members, engage with and enter into contracts with a 4    higher education institution or research entity for 5    research, analysis, training, and educational purposes in 6    furtherance of the purposes of this Act. Regional review 7    team members shall not share information with contractors 8    that would disclose the identities of victims, survivors, 9    deceased, offenders, and their family members or by which 10    their identities can be determined by a reasonably 11    diligent inquiry.12        (3) Seek funds to support the operations of the 13    regional review team and the facilitation of domestic 14    violence fatality reviews.15        (4) Support the implementation of systemic and 16    community reform recommendations in order to advance the 17    purposes of this Act.18        (5) Engage in any other activities that enable the 19    regional review team to carry out the purposes of this 20    Act.21(Source: P.A. 102-520, eff. 8-20-21.)